District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.12

Member’s liability to third parties.

A member of a membership corporation shall not be as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-404.14 and § 29-809.09.